Illinois, session 104th, SB759.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Parking Excise Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 10-1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 525/10-1)7    Sec. 10-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 8the Parking Excise Tax Act. References in this Article to 9"this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.)